Montana, session 2025, HB426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 37-54-503, MCA, is amended to read:
"37-54-503. Owner requirements. (1) An appraisal management company applying for registration in
this state may not be owned by:
(a) a person who has had a license or certificate to act as an appraiser refused, denied, canceled,
revoked for substantive cause, or surrendered in lieu of a pending revocation in any state unless the license or
certificate was subsequently granted or reinstated; or
(b) another entity that is owned by a person who has had a license or certificate to act as an
appraiser refused, denied, canceled, revoked for substantive cause, or surrendered in lieu of a pending
revocation in any state unless the license or certificate was subsequently granted or reinstated.
(2) Each person who owns an appraisal management company in this state:
(a) must be of good moral character, as determined by the board; and
(b) shall submit to a background examination as determined by the board.
(3) Each appraisal management company applying for registration in this state shall certify to the
board that the appraisal management company has reviewed each person or entity that directly or indirectly
owns the appraisal management company, in whole or in part, and that no person or entity that directly or
indirectly owns the appraisal management company, in whole or in part, has had a license, a certificate, or
registration to act as an appraiser or appraisal management company refused, denied, canceled, revoked, or
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 426
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 426
surrendered in lieu of a pending revocation in any state."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 426
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 426, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 426
INTRODUCED BY V. MOORE
AN ACT CLARIFYING LAWS RELATED TO REAL ESTATE APPRAISER REVOCATIONS; SPECIFYING
PROVISIONS FOR SUBSTANTIVE CAUSE IN THE REVOCATION OF LICENSES; REVISING PROVISIONS
FOR APPLICATIONS FOR REGISTRATION TO COMPLY WITH FEDERAL REQUIREMENTS; AND
AMENDING SECTION 37-54-503, MCA.”